Alaska, session 34, HB166.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 14.30 is amended by adding a new section to read: 05 Sec. 14.30.363. Opioid abuse awareness and prevention curriculum. (a) 06 The department shall develop an opioid abuse awareness and prevention curriculum 07 for students in grades six through 12 relating to the dangers associated with, and the 08 physical, psychological, and physiological consequences related to, opioid abuse and 09 opioid addiction. The curriculum must provide at least 60 minutes of instruction 10 annually relating to opioid abuse awareness and prevention, including 11 (1) the dangers of using opioids, including drugs that may contain 12 fentanyl; 13 (2) awareness of opioids that target children, including drugs 14 containing fentanyl that are designed to look like candy; 01 (3) the science related to using opioids, including drugs that contain 02 fentanyl; 03 (4) prevention of opioid abuse, including safe use of opioid 04 prescription medications; and 05 (5) detection of early warning signs related to opioid addiction in 06 school-aged children. 07 (b) In developing the curriculum, the department shall consult with 08 (1) the Department of Health; 09 (2) state and tribal entities and state residents that have experience in 10 reducing, preventing, and responding to opioid overdoses, including overdoses caused 11 by drugs containing fentanyl; and 12 (3) family members of individuals who have had an opioid overdose, 13 including overdoses caused by drugs containing fentanyl. 14 (c) Each school district shall teach the curriculum 15 (1) to students in grades six through 12; and 16 (2) during, or as close as practicable to, the last week in October. 17 (d) In this section, 18 (1) "curriculum" means the opioid abuse awareness and prevention 19 curriculum described in (a) of this section; 20 (2) "drugs" has the meaning given in AS 47.37.270; 21 (3) "opioid" has the meaning given in AS 17.20.085(e); 22 (4) "opioid abuse" and "opioid addiction" mean 23 (A) a physiological or psychological dependency, or both, on 24 an opioid; or 25 (B) habitual lack of self-control in using opioids to the extent 26 that a person's health is substantially impaired or a person's social or economic 27 function is substantially disrupted; 28 (5) "school district" has the meaning given in AS 14.30.350. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.